Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Chapter 40. The University of Alaska and the Community Colleges.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The university is similar in all or most respects to other state executive agencies for purposes of budgeting and accounting; it does not have any peculiar status by virtue of being constitutionally established.
February 28, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

The provisions of the Fiscal Procedures Act, AS 37.05, apply to the University of Alaska except for those provisions of AS

37.05.130

,

37.05.170

,

37.05.190

and

37.05.220

— 37.05.280 (now repealed, except AS

37.05.225

which is now AS

36.30.180

) which are in conflict with this chapter.
February 28, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

The university’s budget can be made subject to line item appropriations by the legislature to the same extent that the budget for the rest of the executive branch of government is subject to line item appropriations.
Similarly, the legislature can make appropriations to the university using different budget units than those requested by the Board of Regents to the same extent that it can make appropriations for executive branch activities using different budget units than those requested by the governor.
February 29, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

Physical or mental illness as basis of dismissal of student. 17 ALR4th 519.

Off campus conduct, expulsion, suspension, or disciplinary action against students based on off campus misconduct. 28 ALR4th 463.

Privileged nature of statements by members of governing body of public institution of higher learning. 33 ALR4th 632.

What are educational institutions within state property tax exemption provisions. 34 ALR4th 698.

Validity of regulation of political or voter registration activity in student housing facilities. 39 ALR4th 1137.

What constitutes legitimate research justifying inspection of records not open to general public. 40 ALR4th 333.